Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.50.895

Apprentice education waivers.

With regard to waivers for courses offered for the purpose of satisfying related or supplemental educational requirements for apprentices registered with the Washington state apprenticeship council or the federal bureau of apprenticeship and training, colleges may at the request of an apprenticeship organization, deduct the tuition owed from training contracts with that apprentice organization.

[ 2005 c 159 s 1.]